Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 3. EMPLOYER-EMPLOYEE RELATIONS

CHAPTER 105. EMPLOYMENT TERMINATION FOR FALSIFICATION OF MILITARY RECORD IN OBTAINING EMPLOYMENT OR EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS

Sec. 105.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Employee" means an individual who is employed by an employer for compensation.

(2) "Employer" means a person who employs one or more employees.

(3) "Military record" has the meaning assigned by Section 32.54, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (S.B. 664), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 105.002. EMPLOYMENT TERMINATION; EMPLOYMENT CONTRACT VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE. (a) An employer may discharge an employee, regardless of whether the employee is employed under an employment contract with the employer, if the employer determines, based on a reasonable factual basis, that the employee, in obtaining the employee's employment or any benefit relating to the employee's employment, falsified or otherwise misrepresented any information regarding the employee's military record in a manner that would constitute an offense under Section 32.54, Penal Code.

(b) An employment contract entered into by an employer with an employee discharged by the employer under this section is void and unenforceable as against public policy.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (S.B. 664), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 105.003. SUIT TO APPEAL TERMINATION. An employee who was employed by an employer under an employment contract on the date of the employee's termination and who believes the employee was wrongfully terminated under Section 105.002 may bring suit against the employer in a district court in the county in which the termination occurred for appropriate relief, including rehiring or reinstatement to the employee's previous job, payment of back wages, and reestablishment of employee benefits to which the employee otherwise would have been eligible if the employee had not been terminated.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (S.B. 664), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.